Hawaii statutes.
§664-23 Hearing, order, kind of fence and
markers, etc. [(a)] At the time set for the hearing of the petition[,]
the court and the parties shall view the line of fence or proposed fence. The
court shall decide equitably on the kind of fence to be built or maintained as
circumstances or desired purposes may require and the portion or portions to be
erected or maintained by either the respective land owners or any of the
occupants or lessees of the particular parcels of land affected, insofar as
their respective interests are concerned, or the share which each shall
contribute to the cost thereof. When the desired fence serves primarily for
boundary identification[,] the court may order that pipes set in concrete
monuments or other satisfactory boundary markers of a somewhat permanent nature
may be installed and maintained at all corners, end points[,] or angle points
of each boundary fence and may also order that commonly used fence posts be
installed along the boundary under consideration at approximately equal
intervals or spans ranging in distance from twenty feet up to five hundred
feet, to identify such boundary[,] and in all such boundary identification
cases it may waive the use of wire or the full compliance with the requirements
of a lawful fence.

[(b)] When the desired fence is intended for
the purpose of confining animals of each adjacent owner, adjacent occupant, or
adjacent lessee of land in their respective lands, the court shall decide
equitably on the kind of fence to be built or maintained, to the end that
trespass shall be prevented and that injury or damage to either party shall be
reduced to the very minimum, and the portion or portions to be erected or
maintained by either the respective land owners or any of the occupants or
lessees of the particular parcels of land affected, insofar as their respective
interests are concerned, or the share which each shall contribute to the cost
thereof.

[(c)] The court shall specify the time within
which the work shall be done and shall decide all disputes which may arise
between the parties concerning the same and shall thereupon enter a decree.

[(d)] In case any party neglects or refuses to
build or maintain or to pay the party's share of the cost thereof in accordance
with the decree, the court, upon application therefor by the party aggrieved,
may direct compliance with the decree at the expense of the defaulting party
and enter judgment for the amount thereof, or for the defaulting party's part
of the cost thereof if the work has been done, and issue execution therefor, or
may enforce compliance with the decree by other appropriate proceedings. [L
1931, c 101, §3; RL 1935, §3673; am L 1935, c 52, §2; am L 1941, c 219, §2; RL
1945, §10214; RL 1955, §234-22; HRS §664-23; am L 1972, c 90, §6(g), (h); gen
ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Enforcement of judgment for specific acts, see HRCP rule 70.

Case Notes

Notice required of proceeding to assess expense. 5 H. 286
(1885).

Decree must include time within which work shall be done. 7
H. 266 (1888).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next